Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
SECTION 1.  Section 6, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) Sections 1 and 2 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 527,  Oregon Laws 2019,  are repealed
on January 2, [ 2022] 2024.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Veteran Educational Bridge Grant Program Fund established
under section 2 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 527, Oregon  Laws 2019,  on [ January 2, 2022 ] the date
specified in subsection  (1) of this section , after reversion of unspent lottery allocations to the
Veterans’ Service Fund  established under ORS 406.140, shall be transferred to the Veterans’ Edu-
cational Aid Account established under ORS 408.090.
SECTION 2.  Section 8, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  The amendments to ORS 408.090 by  section 7 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 527, Oregon
Laws 2019, become operative on [ January 2, 2022 ] the date specified in  section 6, chapter 527,
Oregon Laws 2019.
LEGISLATIVE FISCAL OFFICE
SECTION 3.  ORS 173.420 is amended to read:
173.420. (1) Pursuant to the policies and directions of the appointing authority,  the Legislative
Fiscal Officer shall:
(a) Ascertain facts and make recommendations  to the Legislative Assembly concerning the
Governor’s budget.
(b) Ascertain facts  concerning state expenditures and make estimates concerning state expend-
itures.
(c) Ascertain facts  and make recommendations concerning the fiscal implications of the organ-
ization and functions of the state and its agencies.
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 1
(d) Ascertain facts and make recommendations on such other matters  as may be provided for
by joint or concurrent resolution.
(e) Furnish such assistance in the performance of their duties as is requested by the House Re-
venue Committee,  the Senate Revenue Committee, the Legislative Revenue Officer and other legis-
lative standing and interim committees and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Pursuant to the policies and directions of the appointing authority, the Legislative  Fiscal
Officer may enter into contracts to carry out the functions of the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(3) The Legislative Fiscal Officer  shall cause a study to be conducted prior to the beginning of
each odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly that reports  the preceding two
[calendar] years’ administrative costs and the transfer rate of the Oregon State  Lottery Commission,
in order to determine if additional funds may be made available for public purposes.
OREGON BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT
SECTION 4. On June 30, 2021, the uncommitted balance of the  allocation made to the
Oregon Business Development Department from the  Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund by section 3 (4), chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019,  as amended by section 1,
chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is transferred to  the Tide Gate Grant
and Loan Fund established under section 21, chapter  10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special
session).
NOTE: Sections 5 and 6 were deleted by amendment.  Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES COMMISSION
SECTION 7.  ORS 151.225 is amended to read:
151.225. (1) The Public Defense  Services Account is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Public Defense Services Account is continuously  appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission [ to] for :
(a) [ Reimburse the actual costs and  expenses, including personnel expenses, incurred in ] Adminis-
tration and support of the public defense system;
(b) [ Reimburse] Reimbursement of  the  State Court Administrator under ORS 151.216 (1)(i); and
[(c) Pay other expenses in connection with the legal representation  of persons for which the com-
mission is responsible by law, including expenses incurred in  the administration of the public defense
system.]
(c) Legal representation of parents and  children involved in foster care for which
matching funds under 45 C.F.R. 1356.60(c) may be used.
(2) [All moneys received by the Judicial  Department under ORS 135.050 (8), 151.487 (1), 419A.211,
419B.198 (1), 419C.203 (1) or 419C.535 (2) ] The following moneys  shall be  deposited in the Public
Defense Services Account[ .]:
(a) Moneys received by the commission from the State Court  Administrator under ORS
151.216 (1)(i);
(b) Moneys received by the Judicial Department under  ORS 135.050 (8), 151.487 (1),
419A.211, 419B.198 (1), 419C.203 (1) or 419C.535;
(c) Federal matching funds received under 45 C.F.R. 1356.60(c); and
(d) Miscellaneous revenues and receipts of the commission.
(3) All gifts, grants or contributions accepted by the commission under ORS 151.216  shall be
deposited in a separate subaccount created in the Public Defense Services Account to  be used by
the commission for the purpose for which the gift, grant or contribution was given or granted.
SECTION 7a.
If Senate Bill 817 becomes law, section  67, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  817) (amending ORS 151.225), is repealed and ORS 151.225, as amended
by section 7 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 2
151.225. (1) The Public Defense Services Account is established in  the State Treasury, separate
and distinct  from the General Fund. The Public Defense Services Account is continuously appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission for:
(a) Administration and support of the public defense system;
(b) Reimbursement of the State Court Administrator under ORS 151.216 (1)(i); and
(c) Legal representation of parents and children involved in  foster care for which matching
funds under 45 C.F.R. 1356.60(c) may be used.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited in the Public Defense Services Account:
(a) Moneys received by the commission  from the State Court Administrator under ORS 151.216
(1)(i);
(b) Moneys  received by the Judicial Department under ORS 135.050 (8), 151.487 (1), 419A.211[ ,]
or 419B.198 (1)[ , 419C.203 (1) or 419C.535 ];
(c) Federal matching funds received under 45 C.F.R. 1356.60(c); and
(d) Miscellaneous revenues and receipts of the commission.
(3) All gifts, grants or contributions accepted by the commission under ORS 151.216  shall be
deposited in a separate subaccount created in the Public Defense Services Account to  be used by
the commission for the purpose for which the gift, grant or contribution was given or granted.
SECTION 7b.
If Senate Bill 817 becomes law, the amendments  to ORS 151.225 by section
7a of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
SECTION 8.  ORS 3.012 is amended to read:
3.012. (1) The judicial districts, the counties constituting the judicial districts and  the number
of circuit court judges for each judicial district are as follows:
(a) The first judicial district consists of Jackson County and has 10 judges.
(b) The second judicial district consists of Lane County and has 15 judges.
(c) The third judicial district consists of Marion County and has 15 judges.
(d) The fourth judicial district consists of Multnomah County and has 38 judges.
(e) The fifth judicial district consists of Clackamas County and has 11 judges.
(f) The sixth judicial district  consists of the counties of Morrow and Umatilla and has five
judges.
(g) The seventh judicial district consists of the counties  of Gilliam, Hood River, Sherman, Wasco
and Wheeler and has four judges.
(h) The eighth judicial district consists of Baker County and has one judge.
(i) The ninth judicial district consists of Malheur County and has two judges.
(j) The tenth judicial district consists of the counties of Union and Wallowa and has  two judges.
(k) The eleventh judicial district consists of Deschutes County and has [ seven] nine judges.
(L) The twelfth judicial district consists of Polk County and has three judges.
(m) The thirteenth judicial district consists of Klamath County and has five judges.
(n) The fourteenth judicial district consists of Josephine County and has five judges.
(o) The fifteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Coos and Curry and has six  judges.
(p) The sixteenth judicial district consists of Douglas County and has five judges.
(q) The seventeenth judicial district consists of Lincoln County and has three judges.
(r) The eighteenth judicial district consists of Clatsop County and has three judges.
(s) The nineteenth judicial district consists of Columbia County and has three judges.
(t) The twentieth judicial district consists of Washington County and has 15 judges.
(u) The twenty-first judicial district consists of Benton County and has three judges.
(v) The twenty-second judicial district  consists of the counties of Crook and Jefferson and has
three judges.
(w) The twenty-third judicial district consists of Linn County and has five judges.
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 3
(x) The twenty-fourth judicial district consists of  the counties of Grant and Harney and has one
judge.
(y) The twenty-fifth judicial district consists of Yamhill County and has four judges.
(z) The twenty-sixth judicial district consists of Lake County and has one judge.
(aa) The twenty-seventh judicial district consists of Tillamook County and has two judges.
(2) The Secretary of State shall designate position numbers equal to  the number of judges in
each of the judicial  districts established by this section. The positions shall reflect any qualifications
established by ORS 3.041.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
SECTION 9.
Section 5, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate Bill 5514), is re-
pealed.
SECTION 10.  ORS 326.125 is amended to read:
326.125. For the purpose of assisting school districts with capital costs,  the Office of School
Facilities is established within the Department of Education. The office shall be responsible for:
(1) Distributing  hardship grants to school districts with facility needs. Grants awarded under
this section may not exceed $500,000 and shall  be provided to school districts based on the order in
which the Department of Education receives  the completed applications for the grants. A school
district may be eligible for a grant under this subsection if  the school district meets requirements
established by the  State Board of Education by rule, including any requirements to provide matching
funds.
(2) Providing technical assistance  and establishing and maintaining standards for facilities as-
sessments and long-range facilities plans for school districts.
(3) Administering a certification  program for qualified providers of technical assistance for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Providing grants to school districts for the  cost of technical assistance for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section. The State Board of Education may establish  by rule re-
quirements for a school district to receive a grant  under this subsection. Grants for a school district
under this subsection may not exceed:
(a) $20,000 for a facilities assessment;
(b) $25,000 for a long-range facilities plan;
(c) $25,000  for an assessment of school district facilities for potential environmental hazards
under ORS 332.331; and
(d) $25,000 for a seismic assessment or other specialized assessment.
(5) Maintaining the Oregon School Facilities Database. The database  must include information
that:
(a) Assists with analyzing, planning and prioritizing  school capital improvement needs for school
districts by providing district-to-district and school-to-school comparisons; and
(b) Is required by the State Board of Education by rule.
(6) Administering the grant program described in ORS 286A.801.
(7) Administering a statewide facilities assessment program.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private  sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred  from the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account  and moneys received as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 4
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation  grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases  to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination  or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund  to each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s general  purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous  school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned  from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund  shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in the  distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount  of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed [ $7] $3 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds
this limitation, the Department of Education shall prorate the amount of  funds available for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from the  State School Fund no
more than [ $6] $10 million for expenses incurred by the  Office of School Facilities under ORS
326.125 (2) to [ (6)] (7).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall  transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount  of $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the  State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium,  the amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage by which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct  the  state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the  State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 5
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from  the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development of  talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of  a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million  from the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337,  the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing  for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 327.001, as amended by section 1, chapter 11, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), is amended to read:
327.001. (1) The Fund for Student Success is  established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Fund for Student Success shall  consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative As-
sembly, moneys transferred to the fund under ORS 317A.155 and moneys received as provided  in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other  moneys from public and private sources for the Fund for Student Suc-
cess. Moneys received as provided  in this subsection shall be deposited into the Fund for Student
Success.
(4) Moneys  in the Fund for Student Success are continuously appropriated to the department for:
(a) Transfer for each  biennium to the State School Fund in the amount calculated by the Leg-
islative Fiscal Officer and the Legislative Revenue Officer to be the sum of:
(A) At least $40 million, for the purpose of a transfer  under ORS 327.008 (11) to the High Cost
Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348; and
(B) The amount of change in General Fund revenue to be  collected in the biennium due to the
amendments to ORS 316.037 by  section 56, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, and the operation of ORS
317A.100 to 317A.158.
(b) Retention as a reserve for cash flow and revenue shortfall purposes.
[(b)] (c)  Of the amount  in the Fund for Student Success that is not dedicated for transfer as
prescribed by paragraph  (a) of this subsection  or retained under paragraph (b) of this
subsection, transfer to other education accounts as follows:
(A) At least 50 percent to the Student Investment Account established in ORS 327.175.
(B) Up to 30 percent to the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS  327.250.
(C) At least 20 percent to the Early Learning Account established in ORS 327.269.
(5) The department shall make the  transfers prescribed by subsection (4) of this section on a
periodic basis. The transfers must be in amounts that, based on the  most recent data available to
the department, ensure that the amounts and percentages identified in subsection  (4) of this section
are satisfied by the end of the biennium.
SECTION 13.
In addition to the uses  of the Early Learning Account that are authorized
by ORS 327.274, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, the Department of Education and the
Early Learning Division  may expend moneys from the Early Learning Account for the pur-
pose of funding the construction, renovation  and equipping of early learning and child care
facilities in a manner that is  consistent with the statewide early learning system plan over-
seen by the Early Learning Council.
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 6
BUREAU OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
SECTION 14.  ORS 652.409 is amended to read:
652.409. (1) The Wage Security Fund is established separate and distinct from  the General Fund.
After deduction of the amounts provided in ORS 657.439 (2)(a),  all moneys received by the Employ-
ment Department pursuant to ORS 657.439 (2)(a) shall be paid into the State Treasury  and credited
to the Wage Security Fund. All income earned on moneys in the Wage  Security Fund invested by
the State Treasurer shall accrue to the fund.
(2) All income earned on moneys in the Wage Security Fund, and all other moneys in  the fund,
are appropriated continuously to the Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries primarily
to carry out the provisions of ORS 652.414. Moneys in the fund may  also be used, within the [ divi-
sion] divisions of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries that [ enforces] enforce  wage and hour laws
and state laws concerning civil rights , to investigate and  enforce claims of underpaid and unpaid
wages under this chapter and ORS chapter 653  and to investigate conduct that  may constitute
an unlawful practice under ORS chapter 659A .
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
SECTION 15. On or before  March 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Jus-
tice shall submit a report to the chairpersons of the  standing or interim Joint Committee
on Ways and Means regarding  materially significant or noteworthy litigation involving the
state that is ongoing or that concluded in the biennium preceding  the report.
Notwithstanding ORS 192.311 to 192.478, the report described in this section is not a public
record and is not subject to public inspection.
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY SERVICES
SECTION 16.  Section 9, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) The Housing Acquisition Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Housing Acquisition Fund  must be credited
to the fund. The  Housing Acquisition Fund consists of [ moneys deposited in the fund under section
8 of this 2019 Act and may include ] moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Housing and Community Services
Department [ for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 8 of this 2019 Act ] to provide
funding for loans to purchasers of land for affordable housing  and naturally occurring af-
fordable housing.
AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT PROJECTS
SECTION 17. (1) A public body that is carrying out a qualified project shall require each
contractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Enter into a  project labor agreement that, at a minimum, provides for payment of
wages at or above the prevailing rate of wage;
(b) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent of the  work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under the contract, in a manner  consistent with the
apprentices’ respective apprenticeship training programs;
(c) Establish and execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of women,  mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract, with the  aspirational
target of having at least 15 percent of total  work hours performed by individuals in one or
more of those groups; and
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 7
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by the contractor  to abide by the requirements
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the work  to be performed under
the subcontract has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to a  contract for a
qualified project if the public body carrying out the qualified project demonstrates to  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services that:
(a) The qualified  project is primarily located in a county that is characterized as non-
metropolitan by the United States Office of Management and Budget; and
(b) Compliance with the requirements would, with respect to the contract:
(A) Cause significant expense or delay; or
(B) Limit the pool of bidders to fewer than three.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program” means the total system of  apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards and all other terms and conditions for  qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Prevailing rate of wage” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.800.
(f) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(g) “Qualified project” means a project:
(A) For capital improvements to water, sewer, broadband  or transportation
infrastructure;
(B) That has an estimated project cost of at least $10 million; and
(C) That utilizes at least  $750,000 of moneys made available to the state under the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L. 117-2).
(h) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(i) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 18.
The unit captions  used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 19. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 8
Passed by House June 26, 2021
Repassed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3011 (HB 3011-B) Page 9